Utah statutes.
19-6-116.   Application of part subject to state assumption of primary responsibility from federal government -- Authority of political subdivisions.

(1)  The requirements of this part applicable to the generation, treatment, storage, or disposal of hazardous waste, and the rules adopted under this part, do not take effect until this state is qualified to assume, and does assume, primacy from the federal government for the control of hazardous wastes.

(2)  This part does not alter the authority of political subdivisions of the state to control solid and hazardous wastes within their local jurisdictions so long as any local laws, ordinances, or rules are not inconsistent with this part or the rules of the board.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

